liblouis/files/_translation_es-g1.ctb
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#  odt2braille - Braille authoring in OpenOffice.org.
#  Copyright (c) 2010 by DocArch <http://www.docarch.be>.
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

litdigit 1 1
litdigit 2 12
litdigit 3 14
litdigit 4 145
litdigit 5 15
litdigit 6 124
litdigit 7 1245
litdigit 8 125
litdigit 9 24
litdigit 0 245

# Braille indicator opcodes

numsign 3456
capsign 46
begcaps 46-46

# Greek isolated lowercase letters

word \x03B1 4-1                 α                   GREEK SMALL LETTER ALPHA
word \x03B2 4-12                β                   GREEK SMALL LETTER BETA
word \x03B3 4-1245              γ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER GAMMA
word \x03B4 4-145               δ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER DELTA
word \x03B5 4-15                ε                   GREEK SMALL LETTER EPSILON
word \x03B6 4-1356              ζ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER ZETA
word \x03B7 4-156               η                   GREEK SMALL LETTER ETA
word \x03B8 4-1456              θ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER THETA
word \x03B9 4-24                ι                   GREEK SMALL LETTER IOTA
word \x03BA 4-13                κ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER KAPPA
word \x03BB 4-123               λ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER LAMDA
word \x03BC 4-134               μ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER MU
word \x03BD 4-1345              ν                   GREEK SMALL LETTER NU
word \x03BE 4-1346              ξ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER XI
word \x03BF 4-135               ο                   GREEK SMALL LETTER OMICRON
word \x03C0 4-1234              π                   GREEK SMALL LETTER PI
word \x03C1 4-1235              ρ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER RHO
word \x03C2 4-234               ς                   GREEK SMALL LETTER FINAL SIGMA
word \x03C3 4-234               σ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER SIGMA
word \x03C4 4-2345              τ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER TAU
word \x03C5 4-136               υ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER UPSILON
word \x03C6 4-124               φ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER PHI
word \x03C7 4-12346             χ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER CHI
word \x03C8 4-13456             ψ                   GREEK SMALL LETTER PSI
word \x03C9 4-2456              ω                   GREEK SMALL LETTER OMEGA

# Translation opcodes

midnum , 2
midnum . 3
midnum + 235
midnum - 36
midnum : 25
midnum = 2356

repeated \s 0
repeated \t 0
repeated \x00a0 0

repeated ... 3-3-3
repeated --- 36-36-36
repeated ___ 6-6-6
always \s--\s 36-36

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
